Arkansas, session 2025, HB1007.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 16, Chapter 120, Subchapter 8, is
amended to add an additional section to read as follows:
16-120-805. Liability for shooting sports events — Definition.
(a) As used in this section, "shooting sports event" means an:
(1) Event sponsored by the Arkansas State Game and Fish
Commission, the Arkansas Game and Fish Foundation, or Arkansas 4-H
Foundation, Incorporated; and
(2) Instance in which an owner of land or person in control of
the premises who, directly or indirectly, invites or permits without charge a
person or organization to use his or her property for the purposes of
participating in or practice for an Arkansas State Game and Fish Commission,
Arkansas Game and Fish Foundation, or Arkansas 4-H Foundation Program
registered team.
(b)(1) Except as provided in subdivision (b)(2) of this section, a
*CRH022*
02-20-2025 11:18:10 CRH022

As Engrossed: H2/3/25 S2/20/25 HB1007
host of a shooting sports event is not liable for an injury to or the death
of a participant resulting from the inherent risks of a shooting sports
event.
(2) Subdivision (b)(1) of this section does not prevent or limit
the liability of a host of a shooting sports event:
(A) That provides the shooting equipment and knows or
should know that the shooting equipment is faulty to the extent that the
shooting equipment caused injury or death;
(B) That provides the shooting equipment and fails to make
reasonable and prudent efforts to determine the ability of a participant to
engage safely in the shooting sports event or to determine the ability of a
participant to engage safely in the shooting sports event and to safely
manage the particular shooting equipment based on the participant's
representation of his or her ability;
(C) That owns, leases, rents, or otherwise is in lawful
possession and control of the facility at which a participant sustains an
injury or dies because of a dangerous latent condition at the facility that
is known or should have been known to the host of a shooting sports event and
for which warning signs had not been conspicuously posted;
(D) That commits an act or omission that:
(i) Constitutes willful or wanton disregard for the
safety of a participant; and
(ii) Causes an injury or death;
(E) That intentionally injures or causes the death of a
participant; or
(F) Under products liability laws.
(c)(1)(A) A host of a shooting sports event shall post and maintain
signs that contain the warning notice specified in subdivision (c)(2) of this
section.
(B) The signs required under subdivision (c)(1)(A) of this
section shall be placed in a clearly visible location at the facility or
location where the host of a shooting sports event conducts the shooting
sports event.
(C) The warning notice specified in subdivision (c)(2) of
this section shall appear on the sign in black letters with each letter to be
a minimum of one inch (1″) in height.
02-20-2025 11:18:10 CRH022

As Engrossed: H2/3/25 S2/20/25 HB1007
(2) The signs described in subdivision (c)(1) of this section
shall contain the following warning notice:
“WARNING
Under Arkansas law, a host of a shooting sports event is not
liable for an injury to or the death of a participant in a shooting sports
event resulting from the inherent risk of shooting sports events.”.

/s/Puryear




























02-20-2025 11:18:10 CRH022